Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-808
Co-owner; use of common elements; responsibility for maintenance, repair, and replacement.

(1) Each co-owner may use the elements held in common in accordance with the purpose for which they are intended, without hindering or encroaching upon the lawful rights of the other co-owners.

(2) The association of co-owners and board of administrators, or other administrative body governing the condominium, is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of the common elements. Each co-owner of an apartment is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of such co-owner's apartment.

Laws 1963, c. 429, § 8, p. 1439;

Laws 2019, LB42, § 1.